Wyoming statutes. Title 9 Administration of the Government
Article 7. National Conference of Commissioners on Uniform State Laws

§ 9-2-701.
Commissioners; appointment; term; residence; removal; vacancies; expenses; annual report.

The governor may appoint three (3) commissioners to the national conference of commissioners on uniform state laws. Commissioners shall serve three (3) year terms. Each commissioner shall reside in a different judicial district. The governor may remove any commissioner as provided in W.S.

9-1-202

. Vacancies shall be filled by the governor for the unexpired term.

Each commissioner may be reimbursed under W.S.

9-3-102

and

9-3-103

for per diem and travel expenses incurred in attending any annual conference. Each commissioner shall report annually to the governor on the transactions and recommendations of the conference.

History.

Laws 1915, ch. 136, § 1; C.S. 1920, § 4574; R.S. 1931, § 103-701; Laws 1943, ch. 115, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 18-1601; W.S. 1957, § 9-241; W.S. 1977, § 9-3-1301; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1987, ch. 175, § 1.

§ 9-2-702.
Contribution for expenses of national conference.

Each year, an amount determined by the legislature shall be paid to the national conference of commissioners on uniform state laws as the state’s contribution to the expenses of the conference.

History.

Laws 1915, ch. 136, § 2; C.S. 1920, § 4575; R.S. 1931, § 103-702; C.S. 1945, § 18-1602; W.S. 1957, § 9-242; W.S. 1977, § 9-3-1302; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3.